Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1925
Foreclosure of tax lien by county under old law; sale not confirmed prior to May 26, 1943; action to attack; limitation period.

Where any county shall have commenced proceedings in this state under the provisions of section 77-2039, C.S.Supp.,1941, and shall have purchased real estate sold under said proceedings, as trustee for the benefit of the governmental bodies interested in the taxes, and the sale or sales have not been confirmed as of May 26, 1943, but more than two years shall have elapsed since the date of the sale, then the county shall be entitled upon motion to have the sale or sales confirmed and a deed or deeds issued to it and any person, persons, firm or corporation or governmental body, which shall have or have had any interest whatsoever in said real estate, lien thereon or interest in said taxes, shall have one year and no more, under any circumstances whatever, from the date of the issuance of said deeds within which to bring any action whatsoever to attack such proceedings, any of the steps taken thereunder, the method of purchasing, the power of the county either to bring said proceeding or to purchase the property in its name as trustee or said deeds. In the event no such action shall be brought within said period so fixed by this period of limitation, then the title of the county to said premises, as trustee, shall be good and valid as against each and all such person, persons, firms, corporations or governmental bodies, and the county shall not be required to pay the subsequent taxes, levied or assessed against said premises, or the court costs charged against said real estate in the foreclosure proceeding.

Laws 1943, c. 184, § 3, p. 632;

R.S.1943, § 77-1925.